California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
======================================================================
  Code of Civil Procedure
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: October 03, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

TITLE OF ACT

1.

This act shall be known as the Code of Civil Procedure, and is divided into four parts, as follows: Part I. Of Courts of Justice. II. Of Civil Actions. III. Of Special Proceedings of a Civil Nature. IV. Miscellaneous Provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS

2.

This Code takes effect at twelve o'clock noon, on the first day of January, eighteen hundred and seventy-three.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

No part of it is retroactive, unless expressly so declared.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

The rule of the common law, that statutes in derogation thereof are to be strictly construed, has no application to this Code. The Code establishes the law of this State respecting the subjects to which it relates, and its provisions and all proceedings under it are to be liberally construed, with a view to effect its objects and to promote justice.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

The provisions of this Code, so far as they are substantially the same as existing statutes, must be construed as continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

All persons who at the time this Code takes effect hold office under any of the Acts repealed, continue to hold the same according to the tenure thereof, except those offices which are not continued by one of the Codes adopted at this session of the Legislature.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

When any office is abolished by the repeal of any Act, and such Act is not in substance reënacted or continued in either of the Codes, such office ceases at the time the Codes take effect.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

No action or proceeding commenced before this Code takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by its provisions, but the proceedings therein must conform to the requirements of this Code as far as applicable.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

When a limitation or period of time prescribed in any existing statute for acquiring a right or barring a remedy, or for any other purpose, has begun to run before this code goes into effect, and the same or any limitation is prescribed in this code, the time that has already run shall be deemed part of the time prescribed as such limitation by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 20.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

Holidays within the meaning of this code are every Sunday and any other days that are specified or provided for as judicial holidays in Section 135.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

Wherever any notice or other communication is required by this code to be mailed by registered mail by or to any person or corporation, the mailing of such notice or other communication by certified mail shall be deemed to be a sufficient compliance with the requirements of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

The time in which any act provided by law is to be done is computed by excluding the first day, and including the last, unless the last day is a holiday, and then it is also excluded.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

12a.

(a) If the last day for the performance of any act provided or required by law to be performed within a specified period of time is a holiday, then that period is hereby extended to and including the next day that is not a holiday. For purposes of this section, “holiday” means all day on Saturdays, all holidays specified in Section 135 and, to the extent provided in Section 12b, all days that by terms of Section 12b are required to be considered as holidays.

(b) This section
applies to Sections 659, 659a, and 921, and to all other provisions of law providing or requiring an act to be performed on a particular day or within a specified period of time, whether expressed in this or any other code or statute, ordinance, rule, or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12b.

If any city, county, state, or public office, other than a branch office, is closed for the whole of any day, insofar as the business of that office is concerned, that day shall be considered as a holiday for the purposes of computing time under Sections 12 and 12a.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

12c.

(a) Where any law requires an act to be performed no later than a specified number of days before a hearing date, the last day to perform that act shall be determined by counting backward from the hearing date, excluding the day of the hearing as provided by Section 12.

(b) Any additional days added to the specified number of days because of a particular method of service shall be computed by counting
backward from the day determined in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 41, Sec. 1.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

Whenever any act of a secular nature, other than a work of necessity or mercy, is appointed by law or contract to be performed upon a particular day, which day falls upon a holiday, such act may be performed upon the next business day with the same effect as if it had been performed upon the day appointed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

13a.

Any act required by law to be performed on a particular day or within a specified period of time may be performed (but is not hereby required to be performed) on a special holiday as that term is used in Section 6705 of the Government Code, with like effect as if performed on a day which is not a holiday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 594.)
-------------------------------------------

13b.

Any act required by law to be performed on a particular day or within a specified period may be performed (but is not hereby required to be performed) on a Saturday, with like effect as if performed on a day which is not a holiday.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1370.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

When the seal of a Court, public officer, or person is required by law to be affixed to any paper, the word “seal” includes an impression of such seal upon the paper alone as well as upon wax or a wafer affixed thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

Words giving a joint authority to three or more public officers or other persons are construed as giving such authority to a majority of them, unless it is otherwise expressed in the Act giving the authority.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

Words and phrases are construed according to the context and the approved usage of the language; but technical words and phrases, and such others as have acquired a peculiar and appropriate meaning in law, or are defined in the succeeding section, are to be construed according to such peculiar and appropriate meaning or definition.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

(a) Words used in this code in the present tense include the future as well as the present. Words used in the masculine gender include the feminine and neuter. The singular number includes the plural and the plural number includes the singular.

(b) As used in this code, the following words have the following meanings, unless otherwise apparent
from the context:

(1) “Affinity” signifies the connection existing in consequence of marriage, between each of the married persons and the blood relatives of the other when applied to the marriage relation.

(2) “County” includes “city and county.”

(3) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(4) “Month” means a calendar month, unless otherwise expressed.

(5) “Oath” includes an affirmation or declaration.

(A) “Depose” includes any written statement made
under oath or affirmation.

(B) “Testify” includes any mode of oral statement made under oath or affirmation.

(6) “Person” includes a corporation as well as a natural person.

(7) “Process” signifies a writ or summons issued in the course of a judicial proceeding.

(8) “Property” includes both personal and real property.

(A) “Personal property” includes money, goods, chattels, things in action, and evidences of debt.

(B) “Real property” is coextensive with lands, tenements, and hereditaments.

(9) “Section” refers to a section of this code, unless some other code or
statute is expressly mentioned.

(10) “Sheriff” includes marshal.

(11) “Signature” or “subscription” includes a mark of a person’s name, if the person cannot write, with his or her name being written near it by a person who writes his or her own name as a witness. In order that a mark may be acknowledged or serve as the signature to any sworn statement, it shall be witnessed by two persons who shall subscribe their own names as witnesses thereto.

(12) “Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(13) “State” includes the District of Columbia and the territories when applied to the different parts of the United States, and the words “United States” may include the district and territories.

(14) “Will” includes codicil.

(15) “Writ” means an order or precept in writing, issued in the name of the people, or of a court or judicial officer.

(16) “Writing” includes printing and typewriting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 13.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

No statute, law, or rule is continued in force because it is consistent with the provisions of this Code on the same subject; but in all cases provided for by this Code, all statutes, laws, and rules heretofore in force in this State, whether consistent or not with the provisions of this Code, unless expressly continued in force by it, are repealed and abrogated. This repeal or abrogation does not revive any former law heretofore repealed, nor does it affect any right already existing or accrued, or any action or proceeding already taken, except as in this Code provided; nor does it affect any private statute not expressly repealed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

This Act, whenever cited, enumerated, referred to, or amended, may be designated simply as “The Code of Civil Procedure,” adding, when necessary, the number of the section.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

Judicial remedies are such as are administered by the Courts of justice, or by judicial officers empowered for that purpose by the Constitution and statutes of this State.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

These remedies are divided into two classes:

1. Actions; and,

2. Special proceedings.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

An action is an ordinary proceeding in a court of justice by which one party prosecutes another for the declaration, enforcement, or protection of a right, the redress or prevention of a wrong, or the punishment of a public offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1933, Ch. 742.)
-------------------------------------------

23.

Every other remedy is a special proceeding.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

24.

Actions are of two kinds:

1. Civil; and,

2. Criminal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

25.

A civil action arises out of:

1. An obligation;

2. An injury.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

26.

An obligation is a legal duty, by which one person is bound to do or not to do a certain thing, and arises from either of the following:

(a) Contract.

(b) Operation of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 21.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

27.

An injury is of two kinds:

1. To the person; and,

2. To property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

28.

An injury to property consists in depriving its owner of the benefit of it, which is done by taking, withholding, deteriorating, or destroying it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

29.

Every other injury is an injury to the person.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

30.

A civil action is prosecuted by one party against another for the declaration, enforcement or protection of a right, or the redress or prevention of a wrong.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1933, Ch. 742.)
-------------------------------------------

31.

The Penal Code defines and provides for the prosecution of a criminal action.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

32.

When the violation of a right admits of both a civil and criminal remedy, the right to prosecute the one is not merged in the other.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

32.5.

The “jurisdictional classification” of a case means its classification as a limited civil case or an unlimited civil case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

33.

A prosecuting attorney, in his or her discretion, may assist in the civil resolution of a violation of an offense described in Title 13 (commencing with Section 450) of Part 1 of the Penal Code in lieu of filing a criminal complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1518, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

34.

An electronic signature, as defined in Section 17, by a court or judicial officer shall be as effective as an original signature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 32, Sec. 2.   (AB 432)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PART 1. OF COURTS OF JUSTICE [35. - 286.]



TITLE 1. ORGANIZATION AND JURISDICTION [35. - 155.]



  CHAPTER 1. Courts of Justice in General [35. - 38.]

35.

(a) Proceedings in cases involving the registration or denial of registration of voters, the certification or denial of certification of candidates, the certification or denial of certification of ballot measures, election contests, actions under Section 20010 or 20012 of the Elections Code, actions under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 20510) of Division 20 of the Elections Code, and actions under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 21 of the Elections Code shall be placed on the calendar in the order of their date of filing and shall be given precedence.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends
 that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 2839)   Effective September 17, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 4 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 262.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2.5 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

35.

(a) Proceedings in cases involving the registration or denial of registration of voters, the certification or denial of certification of candidates, the certification or denial of certification of ballot measures, election contests, actions under Section 20012 of the Elections Code, actions under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 20510) of Division 20 of the Elections Code, and actions under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 21 of the Elections Code shall be placed on the calendar in the order of their date of filing and shall be given precedence.

(b) This section shall become operative January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 262, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 2839)   Effective September 17, 2024.   Amending action operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 5 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 262.   Amended section operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

36.

(a) A party to a civil action who is over 70 years of age may petition the court for a preference, which the court shall grant if the court makes both of the following findings:

(1) The party has a substantial interest in the action as a whole.

(2) The health of the party is such that a preference is necessary to prevent prejudicing the party’s interest in the litigation.

(b) A civil action to recover damages for wrongful death or personal injury shall be entitled to preference upon the motion of any party to the action who is under 14 years of age unless the court finds that the party does not have a substantial interest in the case as a whole. A civil action subject to subdivision (a) shall be given preference over a case subject to this subdivision.

(c) Unless the court otherwise orders:

(1) A party may file and serve a motion for preference supported by a declaration of the moving party that all essential parties have been served with process or have appeared.

(2) At any time during the pendency of the action, a party who reaches 70 years of age may file and serve a motion for preference.

(d) In its discretion, the court may also grant a motion for preference that is accompanied by clear and convincing medical documentation that concludes that one of the parties suffers from an illness or condition raising substantial medical doubt of survival of that party beyond six months, and that satisfies the court that the interests of justice will be served by granting the preference.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court may in its discretion grant a motion for preference that is supported by a showing that satisfies the court that the interests of justice will be served by granting this preference.

(f) Upon the granting of such a motion for preference, the court shall set the matter for trial not more than 120 days from that date and there shall be no continuance beyond 120 days from the
 granting of the motion for preference except for physical disability of a party or a party’s attorney, or upon a showing of good cause stated in the record. Any continuance shall be for no more than 15 days and no more than one continuance for physical disability may be granted to any party.

(g) Upon the granting of a motion for preference pursuant to subdivision (b), a party in an action based upon a health provider’s alleged professional negligence, as defined in Section 364, shall receive a trial date not sooner than six months and not later than nine months from the date that the motion is granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

36.5.

An affidavit submitted in support of a motion for preference under subdivision (a) of Section 36 may be signed by the attorney for the party seeking preference based upon information and belief as to the medical diagnosis and prognosis of any party. The affidavit is not admissible for any purpose other than a motion for preference under subdivision (a) of Section 36.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1232, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

37.

(a) A civil action shall be entitled to preference, if the action is one in which the plaintiff is seeking damages which were alleged to have been caused by the defendant during the commission of a felony offense for which the defendant has been criminally convicted.

(b) The court shall endeavor to try the action within 120 days of the grant of preference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 938, Sec. 1.   Effective September 20, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

38.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, a reference in a statute to a judicial district means:

(a) As it relates to a court of appeal, the court of appeal district.

(b) As it relates to a superior court, the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 39.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Supreme Court [41. - 46.]

41.

The Supreme Court and the courts of appeal may transact business at any time.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 61.4 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

42.

Adjournments from day to day, or from time to time, are to be construed as recesses in the sessions, and shall not prevent the Supreme Court or the courts of appeal from sitting at any time.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 48 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

43.

The Supreme Court, and the courts of appeal, may affirm, reverse, or modify any judgment or order appealed from, and may direct the proper judgment or order to be entered, or direct a new trial or further proceedings to be had. In giving its decision, if a new trial be granted, the court shall pass upon and determine all the questions of law involved in the case, presented upon such appeal, and necessary to the final determination of the case. Its judgment in appealed cases shall be remitted to the court from which the appeal was taken.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 53 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

44.

Appeals in probate proceedings, in contested election cases, and in actions for libel or slander by a person who holds any elective public office or a candidate for any such office alleged to have occurred during the course of an election campaign shall be given preference in hearing in the courts of appeal, and in the Supreme Court when transferred thereto. All these cases shall be placed on the calendar in the order of their date of issue, next after cases in which the people of the state are parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.   Operative June 6, 1984, pursuant to Sec. 3 of Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

45.

An appeal from a judgment freeing a minor who is a dependent child of the juvenile court from parental custody and control, or denying a recommendation to free a minor from parental custody or control, shall have precedence over all cases in the court to which an appeal in the matter is taken. In order to enable the child to be available for adoption as soon as possible and to minimize the anxiety to all parties, the appellate court shall grant an extension of time to a court reporter or to counsel only upon an exceptional showing of good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

46.

Appeals in actions brought under Section 1094.9 shall be given preference in scheduling for hearing in the courts of appeal, and in the Supreme Court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 527, Sec. 1.   (SB 808)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Superior Courts [71. - 77.]

71.

The process of superior courts shall extend throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

73c.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any other law of this state, the judges of the superior court of the county in which is located the principal office in this state of any savings and loan association of whose business, property and assets possession shall have been taken by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions, may, in their discretion, whenever those judges deem it necessary or advisable, hold hearings relating to the sale, exchange or other disposition of any parcel of real property or any item of personal property of the association,
 regardless of the location of the property, at the county seat of any county in this state or at the places in the county in which the principal office in this state of the association is located at which sessions of the superior court are held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

73d.

Whenever, under Section 73c, it becomes necessary for a judge, clerk, deputy clerk, court reporter or bailiff of or sitting in the superior court of the county in this state in which is located the principal office of any savings and loan association whose business, property and assets are in the possession of the Commissioner of Financial Institutions, to travel to another county, there temporarily to attend hearings relating to the sale, exchange or other disposition of real or personal property of the association, each judge, clerk, deputy clerk, court
 reporter or bailiff shall be allowed the necessary expenses in going to, returning from and attending upon the business of the court. The expenses shall, upon order of the court, be a charge against the funds of the association and paid out of those funds by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

73e.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, in each county wherein the juvenile hall is not located at the county seat of the county, a majority of the judges of the superior court in and for such county may by an order filed with the clerk of the court direct that a session or sessions of the superior court, while sitting for the purpose of hearing and determining cases and proceedings arising under Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 or Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 6 or Chapter 4 of Part 4 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, may be held or
 continued in any place in the county in which the juvenile hall is located and thereafter such session or sessions of the court may be held or continued in the location designated in such order. In a county having two superior court judges the presiding judge may make the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

74.

Adjournments from day to day, or from time to time, are to be construed as recesses in the sessions, and shall not prevent the Court from sitting at any time.

(History: Repealed and added by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

75.

The superior court in any county may by rule provide that, whenever all judges are absent from the county, any noncontested matter in which no evidence is required, or which may be submitted upon affidavits, shall be deemed submitted upon the filing with the clerk of a statement of submission by the party or the party’s attorney or upon the date set for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

77.

(a) In every county there is an appellate division of the superior court consisting of three judges or, when the Chief Justice finds it necessary, four judges.

The Chief Justice shall assign judges to the appellate division for specified terms pursuant to rules, not inconsistent with statute, adopted by the Judicial Council to promote the independence and quality of each
 appellate division. Each judge assigned to the appellate division of a superior court shall be a judge of that court, a judge of the superior court of another county, or a judge retired from the superior court or a court of higher jurisdiction in this state.

The Chief Justice shall designate one of the judges of each appellate division as the presiding judge of the division.

(b) In each appellate division, no more than three judges shall participate in a hearing or decision. The presiding judge of the division shall designate the three judges who shall participate.

(c) In addition to their other duties, the judges designated as members of the appellate division of the superior court shall serve for the period specified in the order of designation. Whenever a judge is designated to serve in the appellate division of the superior court of a
 county other than the county in which that judge was elected or appointed as a superior court judge, or if the judge is retired, in a county other than the county in which the judge resides, the judge shall receive expenses for travel, board, and lodging. If the judge is out of the judge’s county overnight or longer, by reason of the designation, that judge shall be paid a per diem allowance in lieu of expenses for board and lodging in the same amounts as are payable for those purposes to justices of the Supreme Court under the rules of the Department of General Services. In addition, a retired judge shall receive for the time so served, amounts equal to that which the judge would have received if the judge had been assigned to the superior court of the county.

(d) The concurrence of two judges of the appellate division of the superior court shall be necessary to render the decision in every case in, and to transact any other business except
 business that may be done at chambers by the presiding judge of, the division. A judgment of the appellate division in an appeal shall contain a brief statement of the reasons for the judgment. A judgment stating only “affirmed” or “reversed” is insufficient. The presiding judge shall convene the appellate division when necessary. The presiding judge shall also supervise its business and transact any business that may be done at chambers.

(e) The appellate division of the superior court has jurisdiction on appeal in all cases in which an appeal may be taken to the superior court or the appellate division of the superior court as provided by law, except where the appeal is a retrial in the superior court.

(f) The powers of each appellate division shall be the same as are now or may hereafter be provided by law or rule of the Judicial Council relating to appeals to the appellate
 division of the superior courts.

(g) The Judicial Council shall promulgate rules, not inconsistent with law, to promote the independence of, and govern the practice and procedure and the disposition of the business of, the appellate division.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (d), appeals from convictions of traffic infractions may be heard and decided by one judge of the appellate division of the superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 40.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.1. Limited Civil Cases [85. - 100.]



  ARTICLE 1. Jurisdiction in Limited Civil Cases [85. - 89.]

85.

Notwithstanding any law, including, but not limited to, a law that classified an action or special proceeding as a limited civil case, an action or special proceeding shall be treated as a limited civil case only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The amount in controversy does not exceed thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).
 As used in this section, “amount in controversy” means the amount of the demand, or the recovery sought, or the value of the property, or the amount of the lien, that is in controversy in the action, exclusive of attorneys’ fees, interest, and costs.

(b) The relief sought is a type that may be granted in a limited civil case.

(c) The relief sought, whether in the complaint, a cross-complaint, or otherwise, is exclusively of a type described in one or more laws that classify an action or special proceeding as a limited civil case or that provide that an action or special proceeding is within the original jurisdiction of the superior court, including, but not limited to, the following provisions:

(1) Section 798.61 or 798.88 of the Civil Code.

(2) Section 1719 of the Civil Code.

(3) Section 3342.5 of the Civil Code.

(4) Section 86.

(5) Section 86.1.

(6) Section 1710.20.

(7) Section 7581 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(8) Section 12647 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(9) Section 27601 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(10) Section 31503 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(11) Section 31621 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(12) Section 52514 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(13) Section 53564 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(14) Section 53069.4 of the Government Code.

(15) Section 53075.6 of the Government Code.

(16) Section 53075.61 of the Government Code.

(17) Section 5411.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(18) Section 9872.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(19) Section 10751 of the Vehicle Code.

(20) Section 14607.6 of the Vehicle Code.

(21) Section 40230 of the Vehicle Code.

(22) Section 40256 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 861, Sec. 2.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

86.

(a) The following civil cases and proceedings are limited civil cases:

(1) A case at law if the demand, exclusive of interest, or the value of the property in controversy amounts to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less. This paragraph does not apply to a case that involves the legality of any tax, impost, assessment, toll, or municipal fine, except an action to enforce payment of delinquent unsecured personal property taxes if the legality of the tax is not contested by the defendant.

(2) An action for dissolution of partnership if the total assets of the partnership do not exceed thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or an action of interpleader if the amount of money or the value of the property involved does not exceed thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(3) An action to cancel or rescind a contract if the relief is sought in connection with an action to recover money not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or property of a
 value not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), paid or delivered under, or in consideration of, the contract; an action to revise a contract where the relief is sought in an action upon the contract if the action otherwise is a limited civil case.

(4) A proceeding in forcible entry or forcible or unlawful detainer if the whole amount of damages claimed is thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000)
 or less.

(5) An action to enforce and foreclose a lien on personal property if the amount of the lien is thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less.

(6) An action to enforce and foreclose, or a petition to release, a lien arising under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, or to enforce and foreclose an assessment lien on a common interest development as defined in Section 4100 or 6534 of the Civil Code, if the amount of the liens is
 thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less. However, if an action to enforce the lien affects property that is also affected by a similar pending action that is not a limited civil case, or if the total amount of liens sought to be foreclosed against the same property aggregates an amount in excess of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), the action is not a limited civil case.

(7) An action for declaratory relief if brought pursuant to either of the following:

(A) By way of cross-complaint as to a right of indemnity with respect to the relief demanded in the complaint or a cross-complaint in an action or
 proceeding that is otherwise a limited civil case.

(B) To conduct a trial after a nonbinding fee arbitration between an attorney and client, pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 6200) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, if the amount in controversy is thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less.

(8) An action to issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction; to take an account, if necessary to preserve the property or rights of any party to a limited civil case; to make any order or perform any act, pursuant to Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 (enforcement of judgments) in a
 limited civil case; to appoint a receiver pursuant to Section 564 in a limited civil case; or to determine title to personal property seized in a limited civil case.

(9) An action under Article 3 (commencing with Section 708.210) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 for the recovery of an interest in personal property or to enforce the liability of the debtor of a judgment debtor if the interest claimed adversely is of a value not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or the debt denied does not exceed
 thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(10) An arbitration-related petition filed pursuant to either of the following:

(A) Article 2 (commencing with Section 1292) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part 3, except for uninsured motorist arbitration proceedings in accordance with Section 11580.2 of the Insurance Code, if the petition is filed before the arbitration award becomes final and the matter to be resolved by arbitration is a limited civil case under paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a) or if the petition is filed after the arbitration award becomes final and the amount of the award and all other rulings, pronouncements, and decisions made in the award are within paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(B) To confirm, correct, or vacate a fee arbitration award
 between an attorney and client that is binding or has become binding, pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 6200) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, if the arbitration award is
 thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less.

(b) The following cases in equity are limited civil cases:

(1) A case to try title to personal property when the amount involved is not more than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(2) A case when equity is pleaded as a defensive matter in any case that is otherwise a limited civil case.

(3) A case to vacate a judgment or order of the court obtained in a limited civil case through extrinsic fraud, mistake, inadvertence, or excusable
 neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 861, Sec. 3.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

86.1.
